Illinois, session 104th, SB235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 3-9005 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/3-9005)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-9005)7    Sec. 3-9005. Powers and duties of State's Attorney. 8    (a) The duty of each State's Attorney shall be:9        (1) To commence and prosecute all actions, suits, 10    indictments and prosecutions, civil and criminal, in the 11    circuit court for the county, in which the people of the 12    State or county may be concerned.13        (2) To prosecute all forfeited bonds and 14    recognizances, and all actions and proceedings for the 15    recovery of debts, revenues, moneys, fines, penalties and 16    forfeitures accruing to the State or the county, or to any 17    school district or road district in the county; also, to 18    prosecute all suits in the county against railroad or 19    transportation companies, which may be prosecuted in the 20    name of the People of the State of Illinois.21        (3) To commence and prosecute all actions and 22    proceedings brought by any county officer in the county 23    officer's official capacity.  SB0235- 2 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1        (4) To defend all actions and proceedings brought 2    against the county, or against any county or State 3    officer, in the county or State officer's official 4    capacity, within the county.5        (5) To attend the examination of all persons brought 6    before any judge on habeas corpus, when the prosecution is 7    in the county.8        (6) To attend before judges and prosecute charges of 9    felony or misdemeanor, for which the offender is required 10    to be recognized to appear before the circuit court, when 11    in the State's Attorney's power so to do.12        (7) To give the State's Attorney's opinion, without 13    fee or reward, to any county officer in the county, upon 14    any question or law relating to any criminal or other 15    matter, in which the people or the county may be 16    concerned.17        (8) To assist the Attorney General whenever it may be 18    necessary, and in cases of appeal from the county to the 19    Supreme Court, to which it is the duty of the Attorney 20    General to attend, the State's Attorney shall furnish the 21    Attorney General at least 10 days before such is due to be 22    filed, a manuscript of a proposed statement, brief and 23    argument to be printed and filed on behalf of the people, 24    prepared in accordance with the rules of the Supreme 25    Court. However, if such brief, argument or other document 26    is due to be filed by law or order of court within this   SB0235- 3 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1    10-day period, then the State's Attorney shall furnish 2    such as soon as may be reasonable.3        (9) To pay all moneys received by the State's Attorney 4    in trust, without delay, to the officer who by law is 5    entitled to the custody thereof.6        (10) To notify, by first class mail, complaining 7    witnesses of the ultimate disposition of the cases arising 8    from an indictment or an information.9        (11) To perform such other and further duties as may, 10    from time to time, be enjoined on the State's Attorney by 11    law.12        (12) To appear in all proceedings by collectors of 13    taxes against delinquent taxpayers for judgments to sell 14    real estate, and see that all the necessary preliminary 15    steps have been legally taken to make the judgment legal 16    and binding.17        (13) To notify, by first-class mail, the State 18    Superintendent of Education, the applicable regional 19    superintendent of schools, and the superintendent of the 20    employing school district or the chief school 21    administrator of the employing nonpublic school, if any, 22    upon the conviction of any individual known to possess a 23    certificate or license issued pursuant to Article 21 or 24    21B, respectively, of the School Code of any offense set 25    forth in Section 21B-80 of the School Code or any other 26    felony conviction, providing the name of the certificate   SB0235- 4 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1    holder, the fact of the conviction, and the name and 2    location of the court where the conviction occurred. The 3    certificate holder must also be contemporaneously sent a 4    copy of the notice. 5    (b) The State's Attorney of each county shall have 6authority to appoint one or more special investigators to 7serve subpoenas and summonses, make return of process, and 8conduct investigations which assist the State's Attorney in 9the performance of the State's Attorney duties. In counties of 10the first and second class, the fees for service of subpoenas 11and summonses are allowed by this Section and shall be 12consistent with those set forth in Section 4-5001 of this Act, 13except when increased by county ordinance as provided for in 14Section 4-5001. In counties of the third class, the fees for 15service of subpoenas and summonses are allowed by this Section 16and shall be consistent with those set forth in Section 174-12001 of this Act. A special investigator shall not carry 18firearms except with permission of the State's Attorney and 19only while carrying appropriate identification indicating the 20special investigator's employment and in the performance of 21the special investigator's assigned duties.22    Subject to the qualifications set forth in this 23subsection, special investigators shall be peace officers and 24shall have all the powers possessed by investigators under the 25State's Attorneys Appellate Prosecutor's Act.26    No special investigator employed by the State's Attorney   SB0235- 5 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1shall have peace officer status or exercise police powers 2unless the special investigator successfully completes the 3basic police training course mandated and approved by the 4Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board or such 5board waives the training requirement by reason of the special 6investigator's prior law enforcement experience or training or 7both. Any State's Attorney appointing a special investigator 8shall consult with all affected local police agencies, to the 9extent consistent with the public interest, if the special 10investigator is assigned to areas within that agency's 11jurisdiction.12    Before a person is appointed as a special investigator, 13the person's fingerprints shall be taken and transmitted to 14the Department of State Police. The Department shall examine 15its records and submit to the State's Attorney of the county in 16which the investigator seeks appointment any conviction 17information concerning the person on file with the Department. 18No person shall be appointed as a special investigator if the 19person has been convicted of a felony or other offense 20involving moral turpitude. A special investigator shall be 21paid a salary and be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred 22in performing the special investigator's assigned duties. The 23county board shall approve the salary and actual expenses and 24appropriate the salary and expenses in the manner prescribed 25by law or ordinance.26    (c) The State's Attorney may request and receive from   SB0235- 6 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1employers, labor unions, telephone companies, and utility 2companies location information concerning putative fathers and 3noncustodial parents for the purpose of establishing a child's 4paternity or establishing, enforcing, or modifying a child 5support obligation. In this subsection, "location information" 6means information about (i) the physical whereabouts of a 7putative father or noncustodial parent, (ii) the putative 8father or noncustodial parent's employer, or (iii) the salary, 9wages, and other compensation paid and the health insurance 10coverage provided to the putative father or noncustodial 11parent by the employer of the putative father or noncustodial 12parent or by a labor union of which the putative father or 13noncustodial parent is a member.14    (d) (Blank).15    (e) The State's Attorney shall have the authority to enter 16into a written agreement with the Department of Revenue for 17pursuit of civil liability under subsection (E) of Section 1817-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012 against persons who have 19issued to the Department checks or other orders in violation 20of the provisions of paragraph (1) of subsection (B) of 21Section 17-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012, with the Department 22to retain the amount owing upon the dishonored check or order 23along with the dishonored check fee imposed under the Uniform 24Penalty and Interest Act, with the balance of damages, fees, 25and costs collected under subsection (E) of Section 17-1 of 26the Criminal Code of 2012 or under Section 17-1a of that Code   SB0235- 7 -LRB104 03937 RLC 13961 b1to be retained by the State's Attorney. The agreement shall 2not affect the allocation of fines and costs imposed in any 3criminal prosecution.4    (f) In a county with less than 2,000,000 inhabitants, and 5only upon receipt of a written request by the superintendent 6of the county Veterans Assistance Commission for the county in 7which the State's Attorney is located, the State's Attorney 8shall have the discretionary authority to render an opinion, 9without fee or reward, upon any question of law relating to a 10matter in which the county Veterans Assistance Commission may 11be concerned. The State's Attorney shall have the discretion 12to grant or decline such a request. 13(Source: P.A. 101-275, eff. 8-9-19; 102-56, eff. 7-9-21.)